Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Article 1B. Permanent Guardianship for Minors

§ 2661.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

“Best interests of the child” means a determination, based on consideration of all relevant factors and available options, of circumstances that will best provide the child with at a minimum all the following:

Adequate food.

Clothing.

Health care.

Any other material needs.

A safe and nurturing environment that meets the child’s present and future developmental needs and promotes appropriate interactions and relationships with family members, foster family, and other people who will play a constructive role in the child’s life.

Support to help the child adjust to home, school, and community.

“Parent” means the parent or parents of a minor.

“Permanent guardian” means one or two adults appointed by the court to act as a parent for a child during the child’s minority.

“Permanent guardianship” means a legal guardianship of a minor that is intended to continue with the same guardian, based on the guardian’s express commitment, for the duration of the child’s minority.

“Relative” means a grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, first cousin, aunt, uncle, great-aunt, great-uncle, niece, or nephew of a person, whether related to the person by the whole or the half blood, affinity, or adoption. The term does not include a person’s stepparent.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2662.
Permanent guardian; rights and obligations.

A permanent guardian shall have parental rights and responsibilities for the child that include:

Providing the child with:

A healthy and safe living environment and daily care.

Education.

Necessary and appropriate health care, including medical, dental, and mental health care.

Making decisions regarding:

Travel.

Management of the child’s income and assets.

The child’s right to marry or enlist in the armed forces.

Representation of the child in legal actions.

Any other matter that involves the child’s welfare and upbringing.

The permanent guardian shall:

Before appointment, expressly commit to remain the permanent guardian and assume the parental rights and responsibilities for the child for the duration of the child’s minority.

Be responsible to the court and the child for the health, education and welfare of the minor.

Comply with all terms of any court order to provide the child’s parent with visitation, contact or information.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2663.
Parent of the minor; rights and obligations; support.

While a permanent guardianship is in effect, the parent shall have the following rights:

Visitation, contact and information to the extent delineated in the order issued by the family division of the superior court. The family division of the superior court shall issue an order regarding visitation, contact and information based on the best interests of the child. The order may prohibit visitation, contact and information. The order may incorporate an agreement reached among the parties.

Inheritance by and from the child.

Right to consent to adoption of the child.

After the court has issued a final order establishing permanent guardianship, the parent shall have no right to seek termination of the guardianship order. The parent may seek only enforcement or modification of an order of visitation, contact or information.

The parent shall have the primary responsibility to support the child.

In the event the income and assets of the parent qualify the child for governmental benefits, the benefits may be conferred upon the child with payment to be made to the permanent guardian. The provision of necessities by the permanent guardian shall not disqualify the child for any benefit or entitlement.

If the child has been in the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families immediately prior to the creation of the guardianship, the Commissioner shall have no further duty of support or care for the child after the establishment of the permanent guardianship unless the family is eligible for kinship guardianship assistance provided for in

33 V.S.A. § 4903

or the Commissioner contractually agrees in writing to that support.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 2664.
Creation of permanent guardianship.

The Family Division of the Superior Court may establish a permanent guardianship at a permanency planning hearing or at any other hearing in which a permanent legal disposition of the child can be made, including a child protection proceeding pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 5318

or a delinquency proceeding pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 5232

. The court shall also issue an order permitting or denying visitation, contact, or information with the parent at the same time the order of permanent guardianship is issued. Before issuing an order for permanent guardianship, the court shall find by clear and convincing evidence all of the following:

Neither parent is able to assume or resume parental duties within a reasonable time.

The child has resided with the permanent guardian for at least six months.

A permanent guardianship is in the best interests of the child.

The proposed permanent guardian:

is emotionally, mentally, and physically suitable to become the permanent guardian; and
(A) (i) is emotionally, mentally, and physically suitable to become the permanent guardian; and

is financially suitable, with kinship guardianship assistance provided for in

33 V.S.A. § 4903

if applicable, to become the permanent guardian;

has expressly committed to remain the permanent guardian for the duration of the child’s minority; and

has expressly demonstrated a clear understanding of the financial implications of becoming a permanent guardian, including an understanding of any resulting loss of State or federal benefits or other assistance.

The parent voluntarily may consent to the permanent guardianship, and shall demonstrate an understanding of the implications and obligations of the consent.

After the Family Division of the Superior Court issues a final order establishing permanent guardianship, the case shall be transferred to the appropriate Probate Division of the Superior Court in the district in which the permanent guardian resides. Jurisdiction shall continue to lie in the Probate Division. Appeal of any decision by the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall be de novo to the Family Division.

The Family Division of the Superior Court may name a successor permanent guardian in the initial permanent guardianship order. Prior to issuing an order naming a successor permanent guardian, the court shall find by clear and convincing evidence that the named successor permanent guardian meets the criteria in subdivision (a)(4) of this section. In the event that the permanent guardian dies or the guardianship is terminated by the Probate Division of the Superior Court, if a successor guardian is named in the initial order, custody of the child transfers to the successor guardian pursuant to subsection 2666(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 123, 123a;

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.

§ 2665.
Reports.

The permanent guardian shall file a written report on the status of the child to the Probate Division of the Superior Court annually pursuant to subdivision 2629(b)(6) of this title and at any other time the court may order.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.

§ 2666.
Modification; termination.

A modification or termination of the permanent guardianship may be requested by the permanent guardian, the child if the child is age 14 or older, or the Commissioner for Children and Families. A modification or termination may also be ordered by the Probate Division of the Superior Court on its own initiative.

Where the permanent guardianship is terminated by the Probate Division of the Superior Court order or the death of the permanent guardian, the custody and guardianship of the child shall not revert to the parent, but to the Commissioner for Children and Families as if the child had been abandoned. If a successor permanent guardian has been named in the initial permanent guardianship order, custody shall transfer to the successor guardian, without reverting first to the Commissioner. The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall notify the Department when custody transfers to the Commissioner or the successor guardian. At any time during the first six months of the successor guardianship, the Probate Division may, upon its own motion and independent of its regular review process, hold a hearing to determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, whether the successor permanent guardian continues to meet the requirements under subdivision 2664(a)(4) of this title.

Upon the death of the permanent guardian or when the permanent guardianship is otherwise terminated by order of the Probate Division, the Probate Division shall issue an order placing the child in the custody of the Commissioner and shall immediately notify the Department for Children and Families, the State’s Attorney, and the Family Division.

The order transferring the child’s legal custody to the Commissioner shall have the same legal effect as a similar order issued by the Family Division under the authority of 33 V.S.A. chapters 51-53.

After the Probate Division issues the order transferring legal custody of the child, the State shall commence proceedings under the authority of 33 V.S.A. chapters 51-53 as if the child were abandoned.

An order for modification or termination of the permanent guardianship shall be based on a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in material circumstances, or that one or more findings required by subsection 2664(a) of this title no longer can be supported by the evidence, and that the proposed modification or termination is in the best interests of the child.

The burden of proof shall be on the party seeking the modification or termination.

In the event that it is necessary to appoint a successor permanent guardian, the parent may be considered with no greater priority than a third party.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.

§ 2667.
Order for visitation, contact, or information; immediate harm to the minor.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear any action to enforce, modify, or terminate the initial order issued by the Family Division of the Superior Court for visitation, contact, or information.

Upon a showing by affidavit of immediate harm to the child, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may temporarily stay the order of visitation or contact on an ex parte basis until a hearing can be held, or stay the order of permanent guardianship and transfer legal custody of the child to the Commissioner for Children and Families.

The order transferring the child’s legal custody to the Commissioner shall have the same legal effect as a similar order issued by the Family Division under the authority of 33 V.S.A. chapters 51-53.

The Probate Division shall then immediately notify the Department for Children and Families, the State’s Attorney, and the Family Division when it has issued an order transferring the child’s legal custody to the Commissioner, and nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the State from commencing proceedings under 33 V.S.A. chapters 51-53.

Nothing in this section shall limit the jurisdiction of the Family Division of the Superior Court to enter an abuse prevention order pursuant to 15 V.S.A. chapter 21. A breach by the permanent guardian of an order for visitation, contact or information shall not be grounds for voiding or terminating the permanent guardianship. However, the court may enforce the order with all the powers and remedies of the court, including contempt.

A modification of an order of visitation or contact shall be based upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in the material circumstances, and that the proposed modification is in the best interests of the child.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238; No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.